Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5830.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 543m. (1) A person is guilty of making a terrorist threat or of making a false report of terrorism if the person does either any of the following: (a) Threatens to commit an act of terrorism and communicates the threat to any other person knowing that the communication would be viewed as threatening violence. (b) Threatens to commit an act of terrorism and communicates the threat with reckless disregard. (c) (b) Knowingly makes a false report of an act of terrorism and communicates the false report to any other person, knowing the report is false. (2) It is not a defense to a prosecution under this section that the defendant did not have the intent or capability of committing the act of terrorism. (3) A person who violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not less than 5 years or more than 20 years. or In addition, the court may impose a fine of not more than $20,000.00. , or both. (4) As used in this section, "reckless disregard" means a conscious disregard of a substantial and unjustifiable risk that a communication will be viewed as threatening violence. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S06767'26) or House Bill No. 5831 (request no. H06767'26) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.